Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. General Procedures for Licensure Boards

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 69, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-1-301.
Purpose and scope.

The purpose of this article is to establish procedures for the operation of boards authorized to establish examination, inspection, permit or license fees for any profession or occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.

11-25-201

,

21-2-802

and

23-2-414

.

The provisions of this article supplement the statutes related to the specific board and profession regulated. If the statutes governing a board or regulated profession are silent or unclear the provisions of this article shall be applied. The statutes governing the operation or creation of a specific board or commission are effective and controlling to the extent they conflict with a provision of this article.

History.

2014 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "11-25-201" for "11-25-105" in (a).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 33-1-302.
Duties of licensure boards.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, a board authorized to establish examination, inspection, permit or license fees for any profession or occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.

11-25-201

,

21-2-802

or

23-2-414

shall:

Prescribe and enforce rules, regulations and policies for its own government consistent with the laws of the state and rules and regulations;

Keep minutes of all meetings at which official action is taken and a record of all official acts;

Fix the time and place of regular meetings, provided, that there shall be at least one (1) meeting per year;

Require adequate internal control structures to ensure the processing and accounting of all financial transactions and, at a minimum, conduct periodic audits of internal controls and financial transactions. Periodic audits conducted under this paragraph may be performed by the department of audit or an independent audit firm retained by the board. The audits shall be performed at intervals as designated by the department of audit in consultation with the board. The audit shall determine:

Whether expenditures are made for the benefit of the state;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 58, § 2.

Whether expenditures are made in compliance with applicable statutes, rules and regulations which govern the specific board or profession; and

Whether revenue transactions and cash handling procedures are reasonable for the volume and manner in which revenues are received.

Provide a copy of the audit required by paragraph (iv) of this subsection to the department of audit and the state auditor. In the event the audit was conducted by the department of audit, a copy of the audit shall be retained by the department of audit and a copy shall be provided to the state auditor;

Prohibit members from receiving compensation as an employee of the board or commission including but not limited to positions of executive director, administrative assistant or other employee serving in a similar capacity;

Compensate each member for per diem and mileage for attending and traveling to and from meetings, hearings and other activities necessary in the performance of the duties of the office in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature. Members who are state employees that receive compensation from their employers for activities performed pursuant to this title or under W.S.

11-25-201

,

21-2-802

or

23-2-414

shall not receive additional compensation but shall receive mileage and per diem as provided under this paragraph if they are not reimbursed by their employers;

Receive budget, fiscal, administrative and clerical service from the department of administration and information as provided in W.S. 9-2-3202(b) and 9-2-1707(b)(iii), except as provided hereinafter. The licensure board or commission shall pay a reasonable rate established by rule and regulation of the department of administration and information for services necessary to support the operation of the licensure board or commission. A board or commission may terminate services described herein upon demonstration to the department of administration and information, in the manner and form determined sufficient by the department of administration and information, that the board or commission is financially independent and able to secure staff to perform the functions necessary for independent operation;

If applicable, pay the amount determined appropriate for any cost allocation program supporting licensure boards as determined by the state budget department as provided in W.S. 9-2-1004(c).

History.

2014 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 58, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 58 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “financial transactions.
Periodic audits conducted under this paragraph may be performed by the department of audit or an independent audit firm retained by the board.
The audits shall be performed at intervals as designated by the department of audit in consultation with the board.
The audit shall” for “receipts to” in (a)(iv); deleted “in administration or operation of the law and applicable rules and regulations” at the end of (a)(iv)(A); substituted “expenditures are made in compliance with applicable statutes, rules and regulations which govern the specific board or profession; and” for “the entity has complied with applicable laws and regulations” in (a)(iv)(C); added (a)(iv)(D); and substituted “In the event the audit was conducted by the department of audit, a copy of the audit shall be retained by the department of audit and a copy shall be provided to the state auditor” for “and the legislative service office” in (a)(v).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 58 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a)(iv)(B), which read: “Whether the financial reports of an audited entity are presented fairly; and.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, substituted "9-2-3202(b)" for "9-2-1002(b)" in the first sentence of (a)(viii); in (a)(ix), added "state budget" preceding "department" and deleted "of administration" preceding "as provided."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 109, § 2, substituted "11-25-201" for "11-25-105" in (a) and (a)(vii).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 33-1-303.
Powers of licensure boards.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, a board authorized to establish examination, inspection, permit or license fees for any profession or occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.

11-25-201

,

21-2-802

or

23-2-414

may:

Enter into agreement with any public or private agency, institution, person or corporation for the performance of acts or furnishing of services or facilities by or for the board or commission;

Delegate temporary licensure authority to licensure board members or staff to be reviewed and approved by the full board;

Seek injunctive relief to prevent individuals from practicing without a license;

Adopt rules and regulations allowing the practice of telemedicine/telehealth and the use of telemedicine/telehealth technologies within an applicable profession or occupation consistent with the profession’s or occupation’s duties and obligations. For purposes of this paragraph, telemedicine/telehealth shall be defined within each promulgated rule in a manner applicable to the individual profession or occupation and in a manner which facilitates the development and promotion of uniform, system wide standards for the practice of telemedicine/telehealth and the use of telemedicine/telehealth technologies. Any board promulgating rules under this paragraph shall first confer with the office of rural health for the purpose of promoting the goals established by W.S. 9-2-117(a)(vi) through (viii).

A board authorized to establish examination, inspection, permit or license fees for any profession or occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.

21-2-802

or

23-2-414

may waive or modify statutory examination or continuing education requirements or other statutory requirements for licensure or permitting if:

The examination is not being given or is not practicably available;

Continuing education opportunities are not practicably available; or

The statutory requirement could not be met due to public health orders or weather conditions.

The relevant licensing or certifying authority may impose reasonable or necessary restrictions or requirements on a license, certification or practice authority affected by a waiver or modification granted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

If the duration of a waiver or modification granted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section exceeds two (2) years, the relevant licensing or certifying authority shall report the matter to the appropriate legislative committee and recommend any appropriate related statutory amendments. For health related occupations the relevant committee shall be the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and for all other matters the relevant committee shall be the joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions interim committee. No waiver or modification granted under subsection (b) of this section shall have a duration of more than four (4) years.

History.

2014 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 90, § 1, effective March 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021; 2021 ch. 136, § 1, effective April 6, 2021.

The 2017 amendment

, added (a)(iv).

Laws 2017, ch. 90, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 109, § 2, substituted "11-25-201" for "11-25-105" in (a).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 136, § 1, added (b) through (d).

Laws 2021, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

§ 33-1-304.
Considering criminal convictions; pre-application determinations.

Except as specifically required by its licensure, certification or registration statutes, every board, commission, commissioner or authority authorized to establish examination, inspection, permit, license, certification or registration requirements or fees for any profession or occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.

7-4-211

,

11-25-201

,

15-5-103

,

17-4-406

,

21-2-802

,

23-2-414

,

26-4-101

or

40-22-109

and who considers criminal convictions as part of its regulatory duties shall not consider prior convictions that do not affect the practice of the profession or occupation or the ability to practice the profession or occupation regulated by the board, commission, commissioner or authority. Specifically, the board, commission, commissioner or authority may cite as state policy the following:

It is public policy to reduce recidivism by addressing barriers to employment and encouraging appropriate employment and licensure of persons with arrest and conviction records;

It is public policy to consider whether the elements of an offense are directly related to the specific duties and responsibilities of that profession or occupation;

It is public policy to consider whether the profession or occupation offers the opportunity for the same or a similar offense to occur;

It is public policy to consider the relationship of the offense to the purposes of regulating the profession or occupation; and

It is public policy to consider whether there is ample opportunity for a person denied a license due to a prior criminal conviction to appeal the denial.

A board or commission licensing, certifying or registering a person to practice or perform a profession or occupation that heals or treats humans:

May always determine that a crime of violence or sexual misconduct is relevant to the ability to practice the profession or occupation, but in making a licensing, certification or registration decision may consider the circumstances of the offense;

Shall refuse to issue or shall permanently revoke a license of any person convicted under W.S. 6-2-502(a)(v).

No board, commission, commissioner or authority authorized to regulate through licensure, certification or registration a profession or occupation under this title, or under W.S.

7-4-211

,

11-25-201

,

15-5-103

,

17-4-406

,

21-2-802

,

23-2-414

,

26-4-101

or

40-22-109

, shall consider evidence of any conviction more than twenty (20) years old, or for a lesser period of time if expressly provided by statute, when analyzing a person’s criminal history pursuant to the board’s, commission’s, commissioner’s or authority’s regulatory duties, except when:

The sentence, including all incarceration, parole and probation, for the conviction is incomplete or has been completed within fewer than the last ten (10) years; or

The conviction is related to the duties and responsibilities of the profession or occupation or as otherwise permitted by licensure, certification or registration statutes.

Any board, commission, commissioner or authority shall be immune from civil liability for acting in accordance with this section with regard to licensing, certifying or registering a person to practice or perform a profession or occupation.

Any person who has been previously convicted of a crime may at any time apply to a board, commission, commissioner or authority authorized to establish examination, inspection, permit, license, certification or registration requirements for any profession or occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.

7-4-211

,

11-25-201

,

15-5-103

,

17-4-406

,

21-2-802

,

23-2-414

,

26-4-101

or

40-22-103

for a determination as to whether one (1) or more of the person’s criminal convictions will prevent the person from receiving a license, certification or registration. Each board, commission, commissioner or authority may by rule establish a procedure by which an application submitted under this subsection is reviewed and may by rule delegate the authority to review an application to a staff member of the board, commission, commissioner or authority. A board, commission, commissioner or authority may request criminal history background information for purposes of reviewing an application under this subsection in accordance with W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xxxix). The board, commission, commissioner or authority may by rule establish and charge a reasonable fee to recover the costs of researching and developing a determination under this subsection, provided that any fee shall not exceed the costs of providing the determination under this subsection. A determination made by a board, commission, commissioner or authority under this subsection shall not be binding upon the board, commission, commissioner or authority.

History.

2018 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021; 2022 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, redesignated (b) as the introductory language of (b) and (b)(i); and added (b)(ii) and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment

substituted “11-25-201” for “11-25-105” in (a) and (c).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (e).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 107, § 1, makes the act effective July, 1, 2018.